District of Columbia statutes.
10-201

Creation.

There is hereby created in and for the District of Columbia a Recreation Board hereinafter referred to as “the Board.”

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 261, ch. 265
1981 Ed., § 8-201.
1973 Ed., § 8-201.
Establishment—D.C. Advisory Committee on Recreation & Parks: See Mayor’s Order 90-191, December 13, 1990.
Recreation Board abolished: The Recreation Board, together with the position of Superintendent of Recreation, was abolished and the functions of both the Board and the Superintendent were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1968. Organization Order No. 10, dated June 27, 1968, established a Department of Recreation, under the direction and control of the Commissioner, headed by a Director of Recreation.